Utah statutes.
41-6a-709.   One-way traffic.
(1) A highway authority may designate any highway, roadway, part of a roadway,
or specific lanes under the highway authority's jurisdiction for one direction
of vehicle travel at all times as indicated by traffic-control devices.
(2)  On a roadway designated for one-way traffic, a person operating a vehicle
shall operate the vehicle in the direction indicated by traffic-control
devices.
(3)  A person operating a vehicle in a roundabout shall operate the vehicle
only to the right of the roundabout island.
